Utah statutes.
9-9-104.   Duties and powers.
(1)  The division shall:
(a)  have all of the functions, powers, duties, rights, and responsibilities
granted to it by this chapter;
(b)  staff those committees or boards as specified in this chapter; and
(c) in accordance with policies set by state government, coordinate relations
between:
(i)  the state;
(ii)  tribal governments;
(iii)  other Indian groups; and
(iv)  federal agencies.
(2) The division may:
(a)  contract with public and private entities to provide services or
facilities;
(b)  acquire and hold funds or other property for the administration of the
programs outlined in this chapter;
(c)  make rules in accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative
Rulemaking Act, that are necessary to carry out the duties of the division;
(d)  accept gifts, grants, devises, and property, in cash or in kind, for the
benefit of Indians; and
(e)  apply or dispose of those gifts, grants, devises, and property received
under Subsection (2)(d) for the use and benefit of Indians within the state.
